Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 7. Licenses, Stamps, Permits and Tags
§ 23-1-706.
Game and fish licenses; confidentiality.

The commission shall establish a process by which an applicant for any game and fish license, permit or tag authorized by this act may designate as public personally identifiable information required for the applicant to purchase the license, permit or tag. Unless designated as public by the applicant or as otherwise provided by law, personally identifiable information submitted for any game and fish license, permit or tag is solely for the use of the department or appropriate law enforcement offices and is not a public record for purposes of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

. As used in this section, “personally identifiable information” includes an applicant’s electronic mail address, date of birth, telephone number, driver’s license number, social security number, passport number, sportsperson identification number or tax identification number or any part of any of the preceding information.

History.

2017 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 122, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.